Hawaii statutes.
[§196-70] Severability. If any provision of
this part is held to be invalid or is superseded, replaced, repealed, or
expires for any reason:

(1) That occurrence shall not
affect any action allowed under this part that is taken prior to that
occurrence by the public utilities commission, an electric utility, the department, the authority, a bondholder, or any financing party, and any such action shall remain in full force and effect; and

(2) The validity and enforceability of the rest of
this part shall remain unaffected. [L 2013, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next